incubator/apertium-ron-ina/apertium-ron-ina.ina.dix
    <pardef n="canta/r__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rea</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nte</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cred/er__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eva</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erea</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ente</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="parti/r__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rea</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ente</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/esser__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esser</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sia</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sia</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esse</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>son</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>so</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>somos</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esseva</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essera</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sera</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esserea</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>serea</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essente</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essete</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/haber__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>haber</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>habe</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>habente</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>habeva</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>habeva</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>habera</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>habera</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>haberea</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>haberea</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>habente</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>habite</l>
          <r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="esser"><i></i><par n="/esser__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="haber"><i></i><par n="/haber__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="arrivar"><i>arriva</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cercar"><i>cerca</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ager"><i>ag</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="appertiner"><i>appertin</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arder"><i>ard</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="attinger"><i>atting</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="batter"><i>batt</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cader"><i>cad</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cognoscer"><i>cognosc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="creder"><i>cred</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="currer"><i>curr</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aperir"><i>aperi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="audir"><i>audi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="convenir"><i>conveni</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="coperir"><i>coperi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dar"><i>da</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="visitar"><i>visita</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="susurrar"><i>susurra</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eveliar"><i>evelia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="comenciar"><i>comencia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sperar"><i>spera</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="concordar"><i>concorda</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="exclamar"><i>exclama</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="soniar"><i>sonia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nutar"><i>nuta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="besoniar"><i>besonia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="memorar"><i>memora</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="renunciar"><i>renuncia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="considerar"><i>considera</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="modificar"><i>modifica</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imprestar"><i>impresta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disveloppar"><i>disveloppa</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amar"><i>ama</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="habitar"><i>habita</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="elaborar"><i>elabora</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="accostumar"><i>accostuma</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flottar"><i>flotta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="executar"><i>executa</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parlar"><i>parla</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="regrettar"><i>regretta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trovar"><i>trova</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cambiar"><i>cambia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ambular"><i>ambula</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="relegar"><i>relega</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reprochar"><i>reprocha</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="respectar"><i>respecta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="marinar"><i>marina</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meritar"><i>merita</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="modular"><i>modula</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mover"><i>mov</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vider"><i>vid</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gauder"><i>gaud</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="placer"><i>plac</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dicer"><i>dic</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="decider"><i>decid</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="interrumper"><i>interrump</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parer"><i>par</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ascender"><i>ascend</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="facer"><i>fac</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="creder"><i>cred</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="attender"><i>attend</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="perder"><i>perd</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scriber"><i>scrib</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="promover"><i>promov</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="attinger"><i>atting</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="introducer"><i>introduc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="clauder"><i>claud</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="predicer"><i>predic</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nascer"><i>nasc</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="abstiner"><i>abstin</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vader"><i>vad</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="biber"><i>bib</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repeter"><i>repet</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="succeder"><i>succed</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="admitter"><i>admitt</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="venir"><i>veni</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="servir"><i>servi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="devenir"><i>deveni</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="finir"><i>fini</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stabilir"><i>stabili</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="discoperir"><i>discoperi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="coperir"><i>coperi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parturir"><i>parturi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aperir"><i>aperi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impovrir"><i>impovri</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inrichir"><i>inrichi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dormir"><i>dormi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="garantir"><i>garanti</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="audir"><i>audi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="resentir"><i>resenti</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mollir"><i>molli</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
